Massachusetts, session 194th, H4756.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22A of chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting,
in paragraph 1, line 28, after the phrase “improvements to the public realm” the following words:
“including district management activities and operations”
SECTION 2. Section 22C of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, in line 11, after the phrase, “public transportation station accessibility improvements”
the following words: “district management activities and operations,”.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 40O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Management entity” the
following definition:-
“Participating property owner”, any property owner who is not exempted from payment
of BID fees and who shall be counted for purposes of establishing the petition threshold and
meeting the signatory requirements.
of 3

SECTION 4. The second paragraph of section 3 of said chapter 40O, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out clause (5) and inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
(5) the criteria for exempting the fee for any class of property owners within the BID
district, and the procedure, if any, for waiving the annual fee of an individual participating
property owner who can provide evidence that the imposition of such fee would create a
significant financial hardship.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of said chapter 40O is hereby amended by striking out the sixth
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
Participation in the BID shall be permanent until after the discontinuation of the BID as
provided in this section, or until the dissolution of the BID under section 10. A non-participating
owner in the district shall become a participating member on the date of a renewal vote, as
provided below. On or before the fifth anniversary of the organization of a newly created BID,
the board of directors of the BID or of its designated management entity shall call a renewal
meeting of the BID members to review the preceding 5–year history of the BID, to propose an
updated improvement plan to succeed the then current improvement plan and to consider
whether to continue the BID. The renewal meeting shall be held at a location within the district.
Notice of the meeting shall be given to participating members in the manner provided in the by-
laws, at least 30 days prior to the meeting. The BID shall continue if a majority of participating
property owners who are not more than 30 days in arrears in any payment due to the BID and are
present at the renewal meeting, in person or by proxy, vote to renew the BID commencing on the
first day of the next fiscal year of the BID. Thereafter, the board of directors of the BID may opt
of 3

for a renewal term of up to 10 years and shall follow all procedures for a renewal meeting
heretofore described.
SECTION 6. Section 7 of said chapter 40O, is hereby amended by striking out the third
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
The BID, through its improvement plan, shall have the option to limit or cap the
maximum annual fee derived from individual properties or the total annual revenue generated by
the BID; the BID may also establish a minimum fee threshold, below which property owners are
exempted from paying the fee.
SECTION 7. Said section 7 of said chapter 40O is hereby further amended by inserting
after the third paragraph the following paragraph:-
The initial management plan may also propose a “phase-in” period of not more than 3
years, with assessments increasing over the stated period. The formula for determining the
district fee structure shall be set forth in the original petition as required by section 3.
SECTION 8. Section 8 of said Chapter 40O is hereby amended by striking out the fifth
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
The BID corporation shall comply with the public charity reporting requirements of
section 8F of chapter 12. A copy shall be made available for the public to access in the town or
city offices or on the municipal website.
of 3